Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
Article 3 Fiscal Bills Generally

28-5-40.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Fiscal Note Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1568, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Revenue and Taxation:
Amend Titles 48, 2, 28, 33, 36, 46, and 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, Relating Respectively, to Revenue and Taxation, Agriculture, the General Assembly, Insurance, Local Government, Public Utilities, and State Government,” see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 217 (2011).

28-5-41.
[Reserved] “Retirement bill” defined.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1568, § 2, and Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8; repealed by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1331, § 1, effective April 10, 1985.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 1331, § 1 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective April 10, 1985.

28-5-41.1.
Economic analysis of certain tax benefits of law or proposed law; analysis on performance and outcomes of Code Section 33-1-25.

An economic analysis shall include, but not be limited to, a good faith estimate as a result of the law or proposed law, on an annual basis for five years thereafter, of the following, on both a direct and indirect basis:

Net change in state revenue;

Net change in state expenditures, which shall include, but not be limited to, costs of administering the bill;

Net change in economic activity; and

If applicable, any net change in public benefit.

On or before May 1 of each year, the chairperson of the House Committee on Ways and Means and the chairperson of the Senate Finance Committee may each request up to five economic analyses, which requests shall be transmitted to the Department of Audits and Accounts. The Department of Audits and Accounts shall contract with one or more independent auditors to complete all such analyses on or before December 1 of the year in which such analysis was requested. Each such request shall be limited to one existing provision of law or proposed law and shall specify one particular exemption, exclusion, or deduction from the base of a tax; credit against a tax; deferral of a tax; a rebate of taxes paid; tax abatement; or preferential tax rate to be analyzed.

Copies of each completed economic analysis shall be provided to the House Budget and Research Office and the Senate Budget and Evaluation Office.

If a fiscal note is requested pursuant to Code Section 28-5-42 and a relevant economic analysis has been conducted within one year of such request, the Office of Planning and Budget may prepare a summary of such economic analysis and attach it with the requested fiscal note.

An economic analysis shall be conducted on the performance and outcomes of Code Section 33-1-25, which shall be completed by December 1, 2021.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-41.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 289, § 1-2/SB 6.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 289, § 1-1/SB 6, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that: “Part I of this Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Tax Credit Return on Investment Act of 2021.’”

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 6: The Review, Creation, and Extension of Georgia Tax Credits and Deductions,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 167, 168 (2021).

28-5-42.
Introduction of bills having significant impact upon anticipated revenues or expenditures; furnishing of fiscal notes.

Any bill having a significant impact on the anticipated revenue or expenditure level of any state department, bureau, board, council, committee, commission, or other state agency must be introduced no later than the twentieth day of any session. The sponsor of such legislation must request a fiscal note from the Office of Planning and Budget and the Department of Audits and Accounts by November 1 of the year preceding the annual convening of the General Assembly in which the bill is to be introduced, but subsequent to the preparation of such bill by the Office of Legislative Counsel. With respect to a member-elect of the General Assembly, such person must request a fiscal note from the Office of Planning and Budget and the Department of Audits and Accounts by December 1 of the year preceding the annual convening of the General Assembly in which the bill is to be introduced, but subsequent to the preparation of such bill by the Office of Legislative Counsel. The director of the Office of Planning and Budget and the state auditor shall prepare and submit the fiscal note not later than the day of convening of the General Assembly.

The failure to request a fiscal note by November 1 as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall preclude consideration of the measure by the Senate or the House of Representatives unless the committee to which a bill is assigned in the chamber in which it is introduced:

Determines that such bill will have a significant impact as described in paragraph (1) of this subsection;

Waives the applicable November 1 or December 1 deadline of paragraph (1) of this subsection;

Requests a fiscal note from the director of the Office of Planning and Budget and the state auditor, except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this Code section; and

Among fiscal notes so requested, the chairperson of such committee suggests a preferred order of completion to guide the director of the Office of Planning and Budget and the state auditor; or

Determines that such bill will not have a significant impact as described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Any such determination or waiver shall be by the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the committee, on a specific motion for waiver, and shall allow consideration of the measure by both chambers so long as the bill has been introduced not later than the twentieth day of any session.

Any general bill having a significant impact on the anticipated revenue or expenditure level of counties and municipalities must be introduced no later than the twentieth day of any session.

This article shall not apply to any local bill affecting a county or municipality which must be advertised in accordance with the requirements of Code Section 28-1-14, relating to the advertisement of local legislation.

In the event any bill having a significant impact as described in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section is introduced after the twentieth day of any session, it shall not be considered or acted upon in any manner by either the Senate or the House of Representatives. The President of the Senate shall decide whether a bill which is introduced in the Senate falls within this category; and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall decide whether a bill which is introduced in the House of Representatives falls within this category. The President of the Senate shall have the same right of decision on House bills which reach the Senate; and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall have the same right of decision on Senate bills which reach the House of Representatives.

In the event a bill having a significant impact as described in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section is introduced not later than the twentieth day of any session, the chairperson of the committee to which such bill is referred shall request the director of the Office of Planning and Budget and the state auditor to submit any such fiscal note as to the fiscal effect of any such bill and to file a copy of such fiscal note with the Senate Budget and Evaluation Office and the House Budget and Research Office. The chairperson shall make such request after the bill is referred to the committee.

The chairperson shall not be required to make such request with respect to any bill for which:

A fiscal note has been requested by the sponsor of the bill pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section and the chairperson has been duly notified in writing of such request by such sponsor; or

The director of the Office of Planning and Budget and the state auditor have previously submitted a fiscal note pursuant to a request under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section.

In the event a determination is made under subparagraph (a)(2)(B) of this Code section that a bill will not have a significant impact, if the director of the Office of Planning and Budget or the state auditor has information or knowledge that any bill will have a significant impact as described in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section, a fiscal note may be prepared according to the criteria outlined in subsection (g) of this Code section. Such a fiscal note may be prepared without a request by the bill’s author or the committees to which it is assigned in either chamber. Any fiscal note prepared according to this subsection shall be distributed consistent with Code Section 28-5-44.

During any regular session of the General Assembly, the director of the Office of Planning and Budget and the state auditor shall prepare and submit the fiscal note within five days after receipt of the request or within ten days if the director of the Office of Planning and Budget and the state auditor have made a formal request for extension of time.

The principal administrative and fiscal officers of all departments, boards, councils, committees, commissions, and other agencies of the state government and, when applicable, of counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions are authorized and directed to cooperate fully with the director of the Office of Planning and Budget and the state auditor in providing any information and assistance necessary in the preparation of fiscal notes pursuant to this Code section.

The fiscal note required by this Code section shall include a reliable estimate in dollars of the anticipated change in revenue or expenditures under the provisions of the bill. It shall also include a statement as to the immediate effect and, if determinable or reasonably foreseeable, the long-range effect of the measure. If, after careful investigation, it is determined that no dollar estimate is possible, the fiscal note shall contain a statement to that effect, setting forth the reasons why no dollar estimate can be given. In this event, the fiscal note shall contain an example based on a specific situation or reflecting the average group of persons possibly affected by the bill so as to provide an indication of the cost of such bill to the General Assembly. Assumptions used to develop these averages shall be noted in the fiscal note and the criteria included herein shall constitute a fiscal note. No comment or opinion regarding the merits of the measure for which the statement is prepared shall be included in the fiscal note; however, technical or mechanical defects may be noted. The state auditor and the director of the Office of Planning and Budget shall jointly prepare their fiscal note; and, if there is a difference of opinion between such officials, it shall be noted in the fiscal note. In the event the director of the Office of Planning and Budget and the state auditor concur that the fiscal note on any such bill cannot be prepared within the five-day limitation in effect during any regular session of the General Assembly, they shall so inform the chairperson in writing and shall be allowed to submit said note not later than ten days after the request for it is made.

For fiscal note requests for a bill having a significant impact on the anticipated revenue or expenditure level of the Department of Education which would create a new program or funding category, the fiscal note shall include a ten-year projection of the costs of such new program or funding category.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1568, § 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 533, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 907, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1809, § 11; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1116, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 54; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1331, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 19; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 28; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1633, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 761, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 1-15/HB 529; Ga. L. 2012, p. 859, § 1/HB 1178; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 28/SB 340.

Cross references.

Fiscal note for fiscal impact on local political subdivisions, §

28-5-49

. Fiscal note for bills impacting employees’ health insurance plans, § 45-18-20.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Budget Accountability and Planning Act of 1993’. ”

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 6: The Review, Creation, and Extension of Georgia Tax Credits and Deductions,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 167, 168 (2021).

28-5-43.
[Reserved] Preparation of actuarial investigations for inclusion in fiscal notes.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1568, § 4 and Ga. L. 1982, p. 1116, § 2, and Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8; repealed by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1331, § 4, effective April 10, 1985.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 1331, § 4 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective April 10, 1985.

28-5-44.
Attachment of fiscal notes to bills; reading of notes at third reading of bills; distribution of notes relating to bills prior to final votes thereon.

The fiscal notes required by this article shall be attached to the bill by the chairman of the committee to which the bill was referred and shall be read to the members of each respective house of the General Assembly at the third reading of the bill. In addition, a copy of each fiscal note required by this article shall be distributed to each member of the respective house of the General Assembly before which the bill is pending prior to any such bill being voted upon by such house of the General Assembly.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1568, § 5.

28-5-45.
Fiscal dedication analysis; requirements; requesting analysis; attachment to legislative bills.

Any bill that provides for the dedication of funds pursuant to Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(r) of the Constitution of Georgia shall not be considered by the General Assembly without a fiscal dedication analysis attached to the bill, and in the case of a regular session, such a bill shall be introduced not later than the twentieth day of such regular session. Any such bill shall not carry over from one regular session to the next, but must be reintroduced with a new or revised fiscal dedication analysis.

A fiscal dedication analysis shall include a reliable estimate in dollars of the amount of revenue dedicated pursuant to the provisions of the bill, as well as a statement as to the immediate effect and, if determinable or reasonably foreseeable, the long-range effect of the measure. The fiscal dedication analysis shall also contain the total amount of funds presently dedicated pursuant to the authority granted by Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(r) of the Constitution of Georgia, the proportion of the total 1 percent imposed by such constitutional provision that the measure at issue would constitute, and the amount and proportion of the tota1 1 percent cap that would remain if the bill becomes law. The fiscal dedication analysis shall also contain a warning regarding any probable or immediately foreseeable conditions by which the bill may cause the 1 percent cap to be exceeded at any time during the period for which the bill is effective.

If, after careful investigation, it is determined that no dollar estimate is possible, the fiscal dedication analysis shall contain a statement to that effect, setting forth the reasons why no dollar estimate can be given. In this event, the fiscal dedication analysis shall contain an example based on a specific situation or reflecting the average group of persons possibly affected by the bill so as to provide an indication of the cost of such bill to the General Assembly. Assumptions used to develop these averages shall be noted in the fiscal dedication analysis and the criteria included herein shall constitute a fiscal dedication analysis.

No comment or opinion regarding the merits of the measure for which the statement is prepared shall be included in the fiscal dedication analysis; however, technical or mechanical defects may be noted.

The state auditor and the director of the Office of Planning and Budget shall jointly prepare their fiscal dedication analysis; and, if there is a difference of opinion between such officials, it shall be noted in the fiscal dedication analysis.

A member who intends to introduce a bill that requires a fiscal dedication analysis shall request a fiscal dedication analysis from the Office of Planning and Budget and the Department of Audits and Accounts by December 1 of the year preceding the annual convening of the General Assembly in which the bill is to be introduced, but subsequent to the preparation of such bill by the Office of Legislative Counsel. The director of the Office of Planning and Budget and the state auditor shall prepare and submit each such timely requested fiscal dedication analysis not later than the day of convening of the General Assembly.

During any regular or special session of the General Assembly, only the chairperson of a committee to which a particular bill is assigned may request a new or revised fiscal dedication analysis for a bill. In such cases, the director of the Office of Planning and Budget and the state auditor shall prepare and submit the fiscal dedication analysis within five days after receipt of the request or within ten days if the director of the Office of Planning and Budget and the state auditor submit a jointly signed notice of a necessary extension of time so informing the requester in writing and shall be allowed to submit said analysis not later than ten days after the request for it is made.

Each fiscal dedication analysis required by this Code section shall be attached to the bill by the chairperson of the committee to which the bill is assigned and shall be read to the members of each respective house of the General Assembly at the third reading of the bill. In addition, a copy of each fiscal dedication analysis or revision thereto required by this Code section shall be distributed to each member of the respective house of the General Assembly before which the bill is pending prior to any such bill being voted upon by such house of the General Assembly.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-45

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 761, § 11/HB 511.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2022.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 761, § 23/HB511, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “In accordance with the requirements of Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(r) of the Constitution of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two thirds’ majority vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives and the amount of the funds dedicated by this Act do not equal or exceed 1 percent of the previous fiscal year’s state revenues subject to appropriations.”